Illinois, session 104th, HB1444.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 19-3 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/19-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 19-3)7    Sec. 19-3. Application for a vote by mail ballot.8    (a) The application for a vote by mail ballot for a single 9election shall be substantially in the following form:10APPLICATION FOR VOTE BY MAIL BALLOT11    To be voted at the .... election in the County of .... and 12State of Illinois.13    I state that I am a resident of .... in the municipality of 14.... in the county of ....; that I have resided at such address 15for at least 30 days; that I am lawfully entitled to vote at 16the .... election to be held on ....; and that I wish to vote 17by mail.18    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 19ballots to be voted by me at such election, and I agree that I 20shall return such ballot or ballots to the official issuing 21the same prior to the closing of the polls on the date of the 22election or, if returned by mail, postmarked no later than 23election day, for counting no later than during the period for   HB1444- 2 -LRB104 05811 SPS 15842 b1counting provisional ballots, the last day of which is the 214th day following election day.3    I understand that this application is made for an official 4vote by mail ballot or ballots to be voted by me at the 5election specified in this application and that I must submit 6a separate application for an official vote by mail ballot or 7ballots to be voted by me at any subsequent election. 8    Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Section 929-10 of the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 10statements set forth in this application are true and correct.11....12*fill in either (1), (2) or (3).13Post office address to which ballot is mailed:14...............15    (a-5) The application for a single vote by mail ballot 16transmitted electronically pursuant to Section 19-2.6 shall be 17substantively similar to the application for a vote by mail 18ballot for a single election and shall include:19        I swear or affirm that I am a voter with a print 20    disability, and, as a result of this disability, I am 21    making a request to receive a vote by mail ballot 22    electronically so that I may privately and independently 23    mark, verify, and print my vote by mail ballot. 24    (a-6) The application for a vote by mail ballot for a 25single election shall include an option to apply for permanent 26vote by mail status in a form consistent with the requirements   HB1444- 3 -LRB104 05811 SPS 15842 b1of subsection (b).2    (b) The application for permanent vote by mail status 3shall be substantially in the following form:4APPLICATION FOR PERMANENT VOTE BY MAIL STATUS5    I am currently a registered voter and wish to apply for 6permanent vote by mail status.7    I state that I am a resident of .... in the municipality of 8.... in the county of ....; that I have resided at such address 9for at least 30 days; that I am lawfully entitled to vote at 10the .... election to be held on ....; and that I wish to vote 11by mail in:12    ..... all subsequent elections that do not require a party 13        designation. 14    ..... all subsequent elections, and I wish to receive a 15        ................... Party vote by mail ballot in 16        elections that require a party designation.17    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 18ballots to be voted by me at such election, and I agree that I 19shall return such ballot or ballots to the official issuing 20the same prior to the closing of the polls on the date of the 21election or, if returned by mail, postmarked no later than 22election day, for counting no later than during the period for 23counting provisional ballots, the last day of which is the 2414th day following election day.25    Under penalties as provided by law under Section 29-10 of 26the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the   HB1444- 4 -LRB104 05811 SPS 15842 b1statements set forth in this application are true and correct.2.... 3Post office address to which ballot is mailed:4...............5    (b-5) The application for permanent vote by mail ballots 6transmitted electronically pursuant to Section 19-2.6 shall be 7substantively similar to the application for permanent vote by 8mail status and shall include: 9        I swear or affirm that I am a voter with a 10    non-temporary print disability, and as a result of this 11    disability, I am making a request to receive vote by mail 12    ballots electronically so that I may privately and 13    independently mark, verify, and print my vote by mail 14    ballots. 15    (c) However, if application is made for a primary election 16ballot, such application shall require the applicant to 17designate the name of the political party with which the 18applicant is affiliated. The election authority shall allow 19any voter on permanent vote by mail status to change his or her 20party affiliation for a primary election ballot by a method 21and deadline published and selected by the election authority. 22    (d) If application is made electronically, the applicant 23shall mark the box associated with the above described 24statement included as part of the online application 25certifying that the statements set forth in the application 26under subsection (a) or (b) are true and correct, and a   HB1444- 5 -LRB104 05811 SPS 15842 b1signature is not required. 2    (e) Any person may produce, reproduce, distribute, or 3return to an election authority an application under this 4Section. If applications are sent to a post office box 5controlled by any individual or organization that is not an 6election authority, those applications shall (i) include a 7valid and current phone number for the individual or 8organization controlling the post office box and (ii) be 9turned over to the appropriate election authority within 7 10days of receipt or, if received within 2 weeks of the election 11in which an applicant intends to vote, within 2 days of 12receipt. Failure to turn over the applications in compliance 13with this paragraph shall constitute a violation of this Code 14and shall be punishable as a petty offense with a fine of $100 15per application. Removing, tampering with, or otherwise 16knowingly making the postmark on the application unreadable by 17the election authority shall establish a rebuttable 18presumption of a violation of this paragraph. Upon receipt, 19the appropriate election authority shall accept and promptly 20process any application under this Section submitted in a form 21substantially similar to that required by this Section, 22including any substantially similar production or reproduction 23generated by the applicant.24    (f) An election authority may combine the applications in 25subsections (a) and (b) onto one form, but the distinction 26between the applications must be clear and the form must   HB1444- 6 -LRB104 05811 SPS 15842 b1provide check boxes for an applicant to indicate whether he or 2she is applying for a single election vote by mail ballot or 3for permanent vote by mail status. 4(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-819, eff. 5-13-22; 5103-467, eff. 8-4-23.)